sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 fanosvikirori/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikiroru/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikiroti/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirou/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirova/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikirozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 fanosviko/D . 
PFX A 0 fanosviko/F . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikori/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikou/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikova/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosvikozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 fanoswero/D . 
PFX A 0 fanoswero/F . 
PFX A 0 fanosweroa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosweroi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosweroka/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosweromu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerori/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosweroru/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanosweroti/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerou/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerova/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoswerozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanoti/C . 
PFX A 0 fanoti/D . 
PFX A 0 fanoti/F . 
PFX A 0 fanoto/C . 
PFX A 0 fanoto/D . 
PFX A 0 fanoto/F . 
PFX A 0 fanotoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotori/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanototi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanototu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanototwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotou/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotova/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanotu/C . 
PFX A 0 fanotu/D . 
PFX A 0 fanotu/F . 
PFX A 0 fanotwu/C . 
PFX A 0 fanotwu/D . 
PFX A 0 fanotwu/F . 
PFX A 0 fanou/C . 
PFX A 0 fanou/D . 
PFX A 0 fanou/F . 
PFX A 0 fanova/C . 
PFX A 0 fanova/D . 
PFX A 0 fanova/F . 
PFX A 0 fanowa/C . 
PFX A 0 fanowa/D . 
PFX A 0 fanowa/F . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzo/F . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzori/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzou/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzova/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanowanzozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozai/C . 
PFX A 0 fanozai/D . 
PFX A 0 fanozai/F . 
PFX A 0 fanozaia/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaichi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaidzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaihu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaihwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaii/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaika/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaikwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaimu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaindi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozairi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozairu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozairwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaiti/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaitu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaitwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaiu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaiva/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaiwa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozaizvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozo/C . 
PFX A 0 fanozo/D . 
PFX A 0 fanozo/F . 
PFX A 0 fanozoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozori/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozou/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozova/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fanozvi/C . 
PFX A 0 fanozvi/D . 
PFX A 0 fanozvi/F . 
PFX A 0 fumo/CDF . 
PFX A 0 fumoa/C . 
PFX A 0 fumoa/D . 
PFX A 0 fumoa/F . 
PFX A 0 fumochi/C . 
PFX A 0 fumochi/D . 
PFX A 0 fumochi/F . 
PFX A 0 fumodo/C . 
PFX A 0 fumodo/D . 
PFX A 0 fumodo/F . 
PFX A 0 fumodoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumododzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodori/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodou/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodova/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumodzi/C . 
PFX A 0 fumodzi/D . 
PFX A 0 fumodzi/F . 
PFX A 0 fumofano/C . 
PFX A 0 fumofano/D . 
PFX A 0 fumofano/F . 
PFX A 0 fumofanoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanori/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanou/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanova/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumofanozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogaro/C . 
PFX A 0 fumogaro/D . 
PFX A 0 fumogaro/F . 
PFX A 0 fumogaroa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogaroi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogaroka/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogaromu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarori/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogaroru/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogaroti/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarou/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarova/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogarozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogo/C . 
PFX A 0 fumogo/D . 
PFX A 0 fumogo/F . 
PFX A 0 fumogoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogori/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogou/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogova/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumogozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumohu/C . 
PFX A 0 fumohu/D . 
PFX A 0 fumohu/F . 
PFX A 0 fumohwu/C . 
PFX A 0 fumohwu/D . 
PFX A 0 fumohwu/F . 
PFX A 0 fumoi/C . 
PFX A 0 fumoi/D . 
PFX A 0 fumoi/F . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvo/C . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvo/F . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvoka/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvori/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvoru/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvoti/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvou/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvova/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoisvozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumoka/C . 
PFX A 0 fumoka/D . 
PFX A 0 fumoka/F . 
PFX A 0 fumoku/C . 
PFX A 0 fumoku/D . 
PFX A 0 fumoku/F . 
PFX A 0 fumombo/C . 
PFX A 0 fumombo/D . 
PFX A 0 fumombo/F . 
PFX A 0 fumomboa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumomboi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumomboka/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombomu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombondi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombori/H . 
PFX A 0 fumomboru/H . 
PFX A 0 fumomborwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumomboti/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombotu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombou/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombova/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombowa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumombozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumomu/C . 
PFX A 0 fumomu/D . 
PFX A 0 fumomu/F . 
PFX A 0 fumondi/C . 
PFX A 0 fumondi/D . 
PFX A 0 fumondi/F . 
PFX A 0 fumondo/C . 
PFX A 0 fumondo/D . 
PFX A 0 fumondo/F . 
PFX A 0 fumondoa/H . 
PFX A 0 fumondochi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumondodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumondohu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumondohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 fumondoi/H . 
PFX A 0 fumondoka/H . 
