sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
anzva/AVQ
badanura/AVQ
bangamura/AVQ
barabadza/AVQ
batsa/AVQ
bayiwa/AVQ
berekesa/AVQ
bhabhamisa/AVQ
bhagura-bhagura/AVQ
bharira/AVQ
bhekera/AVQ
bhidhaira/AVQ
bhofodza/AVQ
bhozera/AVQ
bhukucha/AVQ
bibida/AVQ
bika-bika/AVQ
binin'idza/AVQ
bisa/AVQ
bodana/AVQ
bomhodza/AVQ
bonhora/AVQ
bova/AVQ
bubunyuka/AVQ
bugumura/AVQ
bunda/AVQ
burausha/AVQ
burutsa/AVQ
bvambazura/AVQ
bvaranyura/AVQ
bvenyura/AVQ
bvirisa/AVQ
bvondoka/AVQ
bvorongodza/AVQ
bvuja/AVQ
bvukuta/AVQ
bvumirana/AVQ
bvungunja/AVQ
bvurudza/AVQ
bvuvira/AVQ
bwandira/AVQ
bwazura/AVQ
bwezhuka/AVQ
bwinyisa/AVQ
bwonyoka/AVQ
chachanuka/AVQ
chaduka/AVQ
chakatidza/AVQ
chanjamara/AVQ
charika/AVQ
chayisa/AVQ
checheudza/AVQ
chekenya/AVQ
chemedzeka/AVQ
chengeteka/AVQ
chenyenguka/AVQ
cherenga/AVQ
cheverwa/AVQ
chikichira/AVQ
chingudza/AVQ
chirika/AVQ
chocha/AVQ
chomwaira/AVQ
chovonjera/AVQ
chuvha/AVQ
dadauka/AVQ
dakamura/AVQ
danangura/AVQ
darika/AVQ
debudza/AVQ
demwedzeka/AVQ
detembera/AVQ
dhamba/AVQ
dhidhima/AVQ
dhivhaidha/AVQ
dhuga/AVQ
digura/AVQ
dirwa/AVQ
dongonodza/AVQ
duhumira/AVQ
dunzurira/AVQ
dyira/AVQ
dzambadzamba/AVQ
dzengedzeka/AVQ
dzikirisa/AVQ
dzingisa/AVQ
dzodza/AVQ
dzosa/AVQ
dzututsa/AVQ
dzvitura/AVQ
eka/AVQ
enzanirana/AVQ
fafaika/AVQ
fanira/AVQ
fashura/AVQ
fembuka/AVQ
fenyeura/AVQ
fifinyara/AVQ
fitana/AVQ
fongoka/AVQ
fovera/AVQ
fufuridza/AVQ
fukunya/AVQ
fundira/AVQ
funhuura/AVQ
furikira/AVQ
futsira/AVQ
gachidza/AVQ
gagamara/AVQ
ganhurira/AVQ
gazhura/AVQ
gocha/AVQ
gomedzeka/AVQ
gooza/AVQ
gugudza/AVQ
gumburira/AVQ
gura/AVQ
gutsura/AVQ
gwajarika/AVQ
gwebuka/AVQ
gwevaira/AVQ
hataika/AVQ
hotsirisa/AVQ
hwazha/AVQ
idza/AVQ
itisa/AVQ
janjarika/AVQ
jima/AVQ
jwanya/AVQ
kakamisa/AVQ
kambaira/AVQ
kanganika/AVQ
kanza/AVQ
karuka/AVQ
kaurisa/AVQ
ketai/AVQ
kochekera/AVQ
kokoma/AVQ
komburena/AVQ
konya/AVQ
korora/AVQ
kotsi/AVQ
kudubura/AVQ
kumbira/AVQ
kungurusa/AVQ
kurumuka/AVQ
kuturira/AVQ
kwacharika/AVQ
kwangwamara/AVQ
kwatamuka/AVQ
kwekweretsa/AVQ
kwetsemura/AVQ
kwiridzira/AVQ
mangara/AVQ
mbadza/AVQ
mbunda/AVQ
meneja/AVQ
mhidza/AVQ
miruka/AVQ
monyorosa/AVQ
mvakaira/AVQ
mwararika/AVQ
mwira/AVQ
nambashira/AVQ
nanura/AVQ
ndandira/AVQ
ndiridza/AVQ
nekaira/AVQ
netesa/AVQ
ngengerera/AVQ
ngunduma/AVQ
ngwangwandidza/AVQ
nhanikira/AVQ
nidha/AVQ
njandangura/AVQ
njipa/AVQ
non'ona/AVQ
nwisidzana/AVQ
nyandanudza/AVQ
nyanyidzira/AVQ
nyedza/AVQ
nyerenyeda/AVQ
nyiminyira/AVQ
nyonga/AVQ
nyungurukwa/AVQ
nzurika/AVQ
nzwiririra/AVQ
onda/AVQ
otoka/AVQ
pagura/AVQ
pambiridza/AVQ
panduka/AVQ
papama/AVQ
parira/AVQ
patsurana/AVQ
pekura/AVQ
penzva/AVQ
pesanisa/AVQ
pfaka/AVQ
pfekenura/AVQ
pfipfinhika/AVQ
pfonyedza/AVQ
pfukudza/AVQ
pfumvunyara/AVQ
pfupfuduka/AVQ
pfutidza/AVQ
pikinura/AVQ
pindutsa/AVQ
pipisha/AVQ
pitipidzana/AVQ
pomedzera/AVQ
poshera/AVQ
puka/AVQ
punhura/AVQ
purudzira/AVQ
putunuka/AVQ
pweshuka/AVQ
radza/AVQ
rambika/AVQ
rara/AVQ
ravana/AVQ
rejisita/AVQ
rengenyeka/AVQ
rhenda/AVQ
rimisa/AVQ
risa/AVQ
ronza/AVQ
rovha/AVQ
rumba/AVQ
rurumwa/AVQ
sadaira/AVQ
sambira/AVQ
saruka/AVQ
sekenyedza/AVQ
sera/AVQ
shaina/AVQ
shandisa/AVQ
shatira/AVQ
shereketesa/AVQ
shiripitika/AVQ
shongedza/AVQ
shovora/AVQ
shuruvara/AVQ
sibvura/AVQ
sindimara/AVQ
sokosa/AVQ
subvura/AVQ
sundidzira/AVQ
surikirwa/AVQ
svakuka/AVQ
sveeredza/AVQ
svimisa/AVQ
svogodoka/AVQ
svovera/AVQ
swebedza/AVQ
taika/AVQ
tambanura/AVQ
tandanisa/AVQ
tanika/AVQ
taramutsa/AVQ
tata/AVQ
tawa/AVQ
tekedura/AVQ
temha/AVQ
tengesa/AVQ
terana/AVQ
teteresa/AVQ
ticha/AVQ
tindivarisa/AVQ
titinyara/AVQ
tokonya/AVQ
torana/AVQ
tsamhina/AVQ
tsatikira/AVQ
tsemurisa/AVQ
tsigiduka/AVQ
tsindikidza/AVQ
tsitsitira/AVQ
tsongesa/AVQ
tsumburudzana/AVQ
tsutsutwa/AVQ
tsveduka/AVQ
tsveyama/AVQ
tsvotsvomedza/AVQ
tuchaira/AVQ
tumbidzika/AVQ
tunhira/AVQ
tushuka/AVQ
tuzudza/AVQ
tyorera/AVQ
umburusa/AVQ
unya/AVQ
uza/AVQ
vandurira/AVQ
vaveka/AVQ
vetera/AVQ
vharira/AVQ
vhiiwa/AVQ
vhiyisa/AVQ
vhumira/AVQ
vhurudzira/AVQ
vinza/AVQ
vuza/AVQ
wanziridza/AVQ
wenzenga/AVQ
wonesa/AVQ
yamwa/AVQ
yenderera/AVQ
zamba/AVQ
zendama/AVQ
zhanya/AVQ
zhwanyu/AVQ
zodzera/AVQ
zurura/AVQ
zvidzora/AVQ
zvisusukidza/AVQ
